Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 16.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-649
Purchaser; file action; seller's rights;
limit of recovery.

(1) If a seller does not comply with a demand for remedy
by a purchaser under section 54-647, the purchaser may file an action in a
court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) If a seller
contests a demand for remedy by a purchaser under section 54-647, the seller
may require the purchaser to produce the pet animal for examination or autopsy
by a licensed veterinarian designated by the seller. The seller shall pay
for all costs associated with such examination or autopsy. The seller shall
have a right of recovery against the purchaser if the seller is not obligated
to provide the remedy sought.

(3) The prevailing party in a proceeding
under this section shall be limited to a recovery of actual costs and no more
than five hundred dollars in reasonable attorney's fees.

Laws 2009, LB241, § 16.